Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
PART 2 Notice of Condemnation

Cross references.

Service of process generally, §

9-11-4

.

22-2-20.
Persons entitled to receive notice generally.

Any person seeking to condemn property for public purposes shall serve a notice of condemnation on the owner of the property or of any remainder, reversion, mortgage, lease, security deed, or other interest therein.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 4660; Civil Code 1910, § 5209; Code 1933, § 36-304.

22-2-21.
Direction of notice where owner a minor or under disability; appointment of guardian ad litem.

If the owner of the property or of any interest therein is a minor or under any disability whatsoever, notice of condemnation shall be served upon his or her guardian.

If there is no guardian, notice shall be served personally on the minor and on the judge of the probate court of the county where the property or interest is located. The judge shall thereupon appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the minor in the litigation.

If the judge of the probate court is disqualified, by reason of interest or other cause, notice shall be served on the clerk of the superior court of the county where the property or interest is located, who shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the minor.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, §§ 5-7; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4661, 4662, 4663; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5210, 5211, 5212; Code 1933, §§ 36-305, 36-306, 36-307; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 4.1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

22-2-22.
Serving notice on trustees of trust property and remaindermen.

If the property or interest sought to be condemned is held in trust or if the condemnation is directed toward property in which remainders have been created, notice shall be served on the trustee and on any persons who have an interest under the conveyance.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 8; Civil Code 1895, § 4664; Civil Code 1910, § 5213; Code 1933, § 36-308.

22-2-23.
Direction of notice where owner or guardian a nonresident; representation by judge of the probate court of nonresident owners and others whose addresses are unknown.

If the owner of the property or of any interest therein or the guardian of any owner resides out of the state, notice shall be served on the person in possession of the property or interest. Notice shall also be served on the nonresident owner or owners or the nonresident guardian as provided in Code Section 32-3-9. If the address of the owner or owners or of the guardian is not known, the judge of the probate court of the county where the property or interest is located shall act for such nonresident owners in the manner provided for unrepresented minors in Code Section 22-2-21.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 9; Civil Code 1895, § 4665; Civil Code 1910, § 5214; Code 1933, § 36-309; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 4.2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

22-2-24.
Direction of notice where owner unknown or where unknown remaindermen possible; right of owner to second assessment upon his appearance; return of surplus award to condemnor.

If the owner of the property or of any interest therein is unknown or if there is a possibility of unborn remaindermen having an interest, notice shall be served on the person in actual possession of the property or interest and also on the judge of the probate court of the county where the property or interest is located, who shall act for the unknown owner as provided for unrepresented minors in Code Section 22-2-21, provided that, whenever the unknown owner may appear, he may ask for and have another assessment under the terms of this title and he shall receive the amount then assessed. If the second assessment is less than the first, the judge of the probate court shall return the surplus to the person originally condemning.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 10; Civil Code 1895, § 4666; Civil Code 1910, § 5215; Code 1933, § 36-310.

22-2-25.
Manner and time of service.

Unless service is acknowledged or waived, a copy of the notice of condemnation shall be served by a sheriff or deputy at least 15 days before the day fixed for assessing the damage either:

Personally on the owner of the property or other interest or on the representative of any owner or on any other person entitled to service;

By leaving a copy of the notice at the residence of the owner, representative, or other person entitled to service; or

In the case of an owner, representative, or other person entitled to service who is a nonresident, by mailing a copy to that person’s last known address.

In cases where service cannot be effected by leaving notice at place of residence or by personal service:

Fifteen days before the day fixed for assessing the damages, the sheriff shall post the notice at the door of the courthouse of the county where the property or interest is located; and

One week before the day fixed for assessing the damages, the sheriff shall cause the notice to be published once in the official organ of the county.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, §§ 11, 12; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4667, 4668; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5216, 5217; Code 1933, §§ 36-311, 36-312; Ga. L. 1966, p. 248, § 1.

22-2-26.
Contents of notice.

All notices shall be directed to the owner of the property or of any interest therein and shall:

Describe the property or franchise and the amount of interest therein sought to be condemned;

Fix the time when the hearing will be had on the premises;

Give the name of the assessor selected by the person seeking condemnation; and

Request the owner or owners, the trustee, or the representative, as the case may be, to select an assessor.

If the owner is unknown, the notice shall be directed to “all persons having any interest in the property located at _______________ (description of location of property).”

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 13; Civil Code 1895, § 4669; Civil Code 1910, § 5218; Code 1933, § 36-313.